Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska45-191.05
Waiver of sections; attempt; prohibited.

A waiver of sections 45-189 to 45-191.11 by a borrower prior to or at the time of entering into a loan brokerage agreement is contrary to public policy and shall be void. Any attempt by a loan broker to have a borrower waive any rights pursuant to sections 45-189 to 45-191.11 shall be a violation of such sections.

Laws 1993, LB 270, § 7.